Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 52.02.160 and 2017 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As an alternative to the petition method of formation for fire protection districts provided in this chapter, the legislative authority of a city or town may by resolution, subject to the approval of the voters, establish a fire protection district with boundaries that are the same as the corporate boundaries of the city or town for the provision of fire prevention services, fire suppression services, and emergency medical services, and for the protection of life and property within the city or town.(a) Any resolution adopted by a city or town under this section to establish a fire protection district must, at a minimum:(i) Contain a financing plan for the fire protection district. As part of the financing plan, the city or town may propose the imposition of revenue sources authorized by this title for fire protection districts, such as property taxes, as provided in chapter 52.16 RCW, or benefit charges, as provided in chapter 52.18 RCW; and(ii) Set a date for a public hearing on the resolution.(b) The financing plan in the resolution adopted by the city or town must contain the following information regarding property taxes that will be imposed by the fire protection district and city or town subsequent to the formation of the district:(i) The dollar amount the fire protection district will levy in the first year in which the fire protection district imposes any of the regular property taxes in RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, or 52.16.160;(ii) ((The))If the fire protection district is formed prior to July 1, 2026, the city's or town's highest lawful levy for the purposes of RCW 84.55.092, reduced by the fire protection district's levy amount from (b)(i) of this subsection. This reduced highest lawful levy becomes the city's or town's highest lawful levy since 1986 for subsequent levy limit calculations under chapter 84.55 RCW; and(iii) The estimated aggregate net dollar amount impact on property owners within the city or town based on the ((changes described in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (1)))levy rate including, if the fire protection district is formed prior to July 1, 2026, the city's or town's levy reduction described in (b)(ii) of this subsection.(c) If a city or town proposes the initial imposition of a benefit charge as a revenue source for the fire protection district under (a) of this subsection, the resolution adopted by the city or town must comply with the requirements of RCW 52.18.030.(d) Notice of public hearing on a resolution adopted by a city or town must be published on a city website or local newspaper for three consecutive weeks ((in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town)), and must be posted for at least fifteen days prior to the date of the hearing in three public places within the boundaries of the proposed fire protection district. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail, or in any manner the city legislative authorities deem necessary to notify affected persons. All notices must contain the time, date, and place of the public hearing.(e) Prior to adopting a resolution under this section, the legislative authority of the city or town must:(i) Include labor organizations representing employees who perform fire prevention, fire suppression, and emergency medical services within the city or town, to consult on development of the proposed financing plan, governance structure, and anticipated impacts on service delivery and employment conditions; and(ii) If the city or town is located within the boundaries of a public hospital district, the city or town must consult with the public hospital district on any impact of the financing plan on the public hospital district property tax levy.(2)(a) A resolution adopted under this section is not effective unless approved by the voters of the city or town at a general election. The resolution must be approved:(i) By a simple majority of the voters of the city or town; or(ii) If the resolution proposes the initial imposition of a benefit charge, by sixty percent of the voters of the city or town.(b) An election to approve or reject a resolution forming a fire protection district, including the proposed financial plan and any imposition of revenue sources for the fire protection district, must be conducted by the election officials of the county or counties in which the proposed district is located in accordance with the general election laws of the state. If a resolution forming a fire protection district provides that the fire protection district will be governed by a board of independently elected fire commissioners, as permitted under RCW 52.14.140, then the initial independently elected fire commissioners must be elected at the same election where the resolution is submitted to the voters authorizing the creation of the fire protection district. The election must be held at the next general election date, according to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, occurring after the date of the public hearing on the resolution adopted by the city or town legislative authority. The ballot title must include the information regarding property taxes that is required to be in the financing plan of the resolution under subsection (1)(b) of this section.(c) If a ballot proposition on the resolution is approved by voters, as provided in (a) of this subsection, the county legislative authority shall by resolution declare the fire protection district organized under the name designated in the ballot proposition.(d) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to alter a municipal airport fire department or affect any powers authorized under RCW 14.08.120(((2))). If a question arises as to whether this chapter modifies the affairs of municipal airports in any way, the answer is no.(3) ((A))(a) For any fire protection district formed under this section prior to July 1, 2026, a city or town must reduce its general fund regular property tax levy by the total combined levy of the fire protection district as proposed by the district in accordance with subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section. The reduced levy amount of the city or town must occur in the first year in which the fire protection district imposes any of the property taxes in RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, or 52.16.160 and must be specified in the financing plan and ballot proposition as provided in this section. If the fire protection district does not impose all three levies under RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, and 52.16.160 when it begins operations, the city must further reduce its general fund regular property tax levy if the district initially imposes any of the levies in subsequent years, by the amount of such levy or levies initially imposed in a subsequent year.(b) For any fire protection district formed under this section on or after July 1, 2026, for the city or town participating in the fire protection district, with the exception of cities over 500,000 in population as of 2025, the regular levies of the city or town may not exceed the applicable rates provided in RCW 27.12.390, 52.04.081, and 84.52.043(1) less the aggregate rates of any regular levies made by the district under RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, or 52.16.160.Sec. 2. RCW 52.02.180 and 2017 c 328 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided otherwise in the resolution adopted by the legislative authority of a city or town establishing a fire protection district under RCW 52.02.160, all powers, duties, and functions of the city or town fire department pertaining to fire protection and emergency services of the city or town are transferred to the fire protection district on its creation date.(2)(a) The city or town fire department must transfer or deliver to the fire protection district:(i) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the city or town fire department pertaining to fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties;(ii) All real property and personal property including cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the city or town fire department in carrying out the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties; and(iii) All funds, credits, or other assets held by the city or town fire department in connection with fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties.(b) Any appropriations made to the city or town fire department for carrying out the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties of the city or town must be transferred and credited to the fire protection district.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred to the fire protection district, the legislative authority of the city or town must make a determination as to the proper allocation.(3) All rules and all pending business before the city or town fire department pertaining to the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties transferred must be continued and acted upon by the fire protection district, and all existing contracts and obligations remain in full force and must be performed by the fire protection district.(4) The transfer of powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the city or town fire department do not affect the validity of any act performed before creation of the fire protection district.(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers, the treasurer for the city or town fire department must certify the apportionments.(6)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, all employees of the city or town fire department are transferred to the fire protection district on its creation date. Upon transfer, unless an agreement for different terms of transfer is reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and the fire protection district, an employee is entitled to the employee rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled as an employee of the city or town fire department, including rights to:(i) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of transfer;(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued benefit;(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been completed before the transfer date.(b) If a city or town provides for civil service in its fire department, the collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and the fire protection district must negotiate regarding the establishment of a civil service system within the fire protection district.(c) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law.(7) A fire protection district formed under RCW 52.02.160 may contract with the city or town for services including but not limited to administrative services such as information technology, financial, and human resources functions.Sec. 3. RCW 84.55.092 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state's levies may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized under RCW 52.16.160 or 52.26.140(1)(c) that would have been imposed but for the limitation in RCW 52.18.065 or 52.26.240, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge under chapter 52.18 or 52.26 RCW.(2) The purpose of subsection (1) of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.(((3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any portion of a city or town's regular property tax levy that has been reduced as part of the formation of a fire protection district under RCW 52.02.160.))Sec. 4. RCW 84.52.043 and 2024 c 361 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named are as follows:(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts are as follows: (a) The levies by the state may not exceed the applicable aggregate rate limit specified in RCW 84.52.065 (2) or (4) adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county may not exceed $1.80 per $1,000 of assessed value; (c) the levy by any road district may not exceed $2.25 per $1,000 of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town may not exceed $3.375 per $1,000 of assessed value. However, any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from $1.80 to a rate not to exceed $2.475 per $1,000 of assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within the county do not exceed $4.05 per $1,000 of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the state, may not exceed $5.90 per $1,000 of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts and regional fire protection service authorities that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; (k) the portion of the levy by flood control zone districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.816; (l) levies imposed by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.104.175; (m) levies imposed by any park and recreation district described under RCW 84.52.010(3)(a)(viii); (n) the portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3); ((and)) (o) levies for county hospital purposes under RCW 36.62.090; and (p) the portion of the levies for fire protection districts under RCW 52.02.160 that are protected under RCW 84.52.125.Sec. 5. RCW 84.52.043 and 2024 c 361 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named are as follows:(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts are as follows: (a) The levies by the state may not exceed the applicable aggregate rate limit specified in RCW 84.52.065 (2) or (4) adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county may not exceed $1.80 per $1,000 of assessed value; (c) the levy by any road district may not exceed $2.25 per $1,000 of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town may not exceed $3.375 per $1,000 of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from $1.80 to a rate not to exceed $2.475 per $1,000 of assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within the county do not exceed $4.05 per $1,000 of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the state, may not exceed $5.90 per $1,000 of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts and regional fire protection service authorities that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; (k) the portion of the levy by flood control zone districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.816; (l) levies imposed by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.104.175; (m) the portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3); ((and)) (n) levies for county hospital purposes under RCW 36.62.090; and (o) the portion of the levies for fire protection districts under RCW 52.02.160 that are protected under RCW 84.52.125.Sec. 6. RCW 84.52.125 and 2017 c 196 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:A fire protection district or regional fire protection service authority created under Title 52 RCW may protect the district's or authority's tax levy from prorationing under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b) by imposing up to a total of twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of the tax levies authorized under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160, or 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) outside of the five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation limitation established under RCW 84.52.043(2), if those taxes otherwise would be prorated under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b)(vi).NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Section 4 of this act expires January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. Section 5 of this act takes effect January 1, 2027.--- END ---